New Jersey, session 222, A2689.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall enter into a contract with AAA to allow for the provision of certain motor vehicle services to AAA customers at certain AAA facilities throughout the State.  The contract shall, at a minimum and to the extent practicable, allow for the following motor vehicle services to be provided at certain AAA facilities: (1)   motor vehicle registration renewals, replacements, and duplicates; (2)   drivers license renewals, duplicates, and upgrades to a REAL-ID license; (3)   non-driver identification card renewals, duplicates, and upgrades to a REAL-ID identification card; (4)   license plate surrenders; and (5)   vision tests. b.  No later than one month after the contract agreement is signed by both the commission and AAA, pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the commission shall publish on its Internet website information concerning the motor vehicle services to be offered at AAA facilities throughout the State pursuant to subsection a. of this section. 2.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month following the date of enactment, except that the commission may take such anticipatory actions as may be necessary to implement this act.